Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-101.01
Governor; salary.

Until January 4, 2007, the annual salary of the Governor shall be eighty-five thousand dollars. Commencing January 4, 2007, the annual salary of the Governor shall be one hundred five thousand dollars. Such salary shall be payable in equal monthly installments.

Laws 1986, LB 43, § 2;

Laws 1990, LB 503, § 2;

Laws 2000, LB 956, § 2;

Laws 2006, LB 817, § 2.